Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
TOURISM SPECIAL FUND; EXEMPTIONS; REPORTS

§201B-11 Tourism special fund. (a)
There is established in the state treasury the tourism special fund, into which
shall be deposited:

(1) A portion of the revenues from any transient
accommodations tax, as provided by section 237D-6.5; and

(2) Appropriations by the legislature to the tourism
special fund; and

(3) Gifts, grants, and other funds accepted by the
authority.

(b) Moneys in the tourism special fund may be:

(1) Placed in interest-bearing accounts; provided
that the depository in which the money is deposited furnishes security as
provided in section 38-3; or

(2) Otherwise invested by the authority until such
time as the moneys may be needed; provided that the authority shall limit its investments
to those listed in section 36-21.

All interest accruing from the investment of these
moneys shall be credited to the tourism special fund.

(c) Moneys in the tourism special fund shall
be used by the authority for the purposes of this chapter, provided that:

(1) Not more than 3.5 per cent of this amount shall
be used for administrative expenses, including $15,000 for a protocol fund to
be expended at the discretion of the president and chief executive officer; and

(2) At least $1,000,000 shall be made available to
support efforts to manage, improve, and protect Hawaii's natural environment
and areas frequented by visitors. [L 1998, c 156, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 38,
§4, c 143, §5, and c 250, §4; am L 2004, c 58, §§7, 14(2); am L 2005, c 22, §50
and c 235, §7; am L 2006, c 306, §1; am L Sp 2009, c 5, §§9, 12; am L 2010, c
102, §5]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next